Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 46 Payment of Construction Contracts in Real Property

Editor’s note:

Section 2 of chapter 146 (HB 21-1167), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act adding this article 46 applies to contracts made on or after September 7, 2021.

38-46-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article 46, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Contract” means a contract to construct, alter, or repair a structure on or improvement on real property.

“Contractor” means a person that is a party to a contract with a property owner.

“Property owner” means a private person with an interest, including a leasehold interest, in real property or in a real property fixture that has entered into a contract with a contractor.

“Retainage” means a percentage of:

A contract or subcontract price retained from a contractor or subcontractor as assurance that the contract or subcontract will be satisfactorily completed; or

A supply agreement price as assurance that the goods, materials, or equipment meets the specifications necessary for satisfactory performance of a contract or subcontract.

“Subcontract” means an agreement:

To perform a portion of the work required by a contract; and

To furnish or perform on-site labor, with or without furnishing materials.

To be a subcontract, an agreement need not be made directly with a contractor; the agreement may be made with a subcontractor or a subsequent subcontractor.

“Subcontractor” means a person that enters into a subcontract with a contractor, a subcontractor, or a subsequent subcontractor.

“Subsequent subcontractor” includes a person who has signed a subcontract with a sub-subcontractor, a sub-sub-subcontractor, or any additional level of subcontractor.

“Supply agreement” means an agreement to provide materials, goods, or equipment to a contractor or subcontractor.

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire article added, (HB 21-1167), ch. 146, p. 859, § 1, effective September 7.

38-46-102.
Applicability of article.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this article 46 applies to:

A contract that:

Has a price of at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

Is made between a property owner and a contractor;

A subcontract to a contract described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, notwithstanding that the subcontract price is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

A supply agreement that is made to supply materials, goods, or equipment used to perform a contract notwithstanding that the supply agreement price is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

This article 46 does not apply to:

A single contract that governs the building of either:

One single-family dwelling; or

One multifamily dwelling with no more than four family dwelling units; or

A contract with a public entity, as defined in section 24-91-102 (3).

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire article added, (HB 21-1167), ch. 146, p. 860, § 1, effective September 7.

38-46-103.
Private construction contracts - retainage - conditions precedent.

A property owner, contractor, or subcontractor shall not withhold as retainage more than five percent of the price of the work completed under the contract or subcontract. Making a partial payment under this subsection (1) is not acceptance or approval of some of the work or of a waiver of defects in the work.

This article 46 addresses only the amount of retainage that may be withheld by a property owner, contractor, or subcontractor and does not change, override, or invalidate any other provision in a contract, subcontract, or supply agreement. Such a provision includes, but is not limited to:

A provision relating to timing of a payment, including final payment;

A provision requiring satisfactory performance of the work of the contract, subcontract, or supply agreement before payment is due;

A provision allowing a property owner, contractor, or subcontractor to withhold payment or deduct from any payment otherwise due any backcharges or other amounts as authorized by the contract, subcontract, or supply agreement; or

A provision relating to a condition precedent that must be satisfied before a payment is due to a contractor, subcontractor, sub-subcontractor, or supplier. A condition precedent includes a requirement that:

A contractor must actually receive payment from the property owner to be obliged to make payment to a subcontractor or supplier; or

A subcontractor must actually receive payment from the contractor to be obliged to make payment to a subsequent subcontractor or supplier.

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire article added, (HB 21-1167), ch. 146, p. 861, § 1, effective September 7.

38-46-104.
Lien waivers.

To receive payment under this article 46, the recipient of the payment must provide an executed lien waiver for amounts actually paid if required by the contract, subcontract, or supply agreement.

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire article added, (HB 21-1167), ch. 146, p. 861, § 1, effective September 7.